New Jersey, session 221, A3454.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. No later than six months after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) the Business Action Center within the Department of State shall develop, establish, and implement a two-year Entrepreneur Learners Permit Pilot Program that shall be administered by the center over a period of two consecutive fiscal years.  The purpose of the pilot program shall be to encourage and assist first-time entrepreneurs in starting new businesses in designated industries by providing reimbursements to qualifying entrepreneurs for State filing, permitting, or licensing fees associated with the formation of a qualifying business in the State. b.    Prior to the formation of the business for which the entrepreneur seeks reimbursement of the fees described in subsection a. of this section, an applicant seeking to participate in the pilot program shall submit an application for pilot program eligibility to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center.  The center shall establish criteria for the review and approval of pilot program applications, provided that the center shall: (1)   give priority to womens business applicants and minority business applicants; and (2)   approve for participation in the pilot program only first-time business owners of businesses in a designated industry. c.     The center shall determine the manner in which to provide a reimbursement to a business participating in the pilot program under this section, but the aggregate amount of all reimbursements provided by the center shall not exceed $500,000 in any one fiscal year. d.    The center shall adopt regulations in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act" P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) deemed necessary for the implementation and enforcement of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). e.     On or before February 1 of the pilot programs second fiscal year, the center shall conduct a review of the cumulative effectiveness of the pilot program.  The review shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   the number and type of New Jersey businesses that were formed in connection with the pilot program; (2)   the status of each business formed in connection with the pilot program; (3)   the number of employees employed by each business receiving a reimbursement under the pilot program; (4)   the economic impact to the State from the pilot program; (5)   the satisfaction of participants in the pilot program; and (6)   a recommendation concerning whether the pilot program should be made permanent or continued for additional fiscal years. f.     The center shall compile a report based upon the review required pursuant to subsection e. of this section and shall submit the report to the Governor and, in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature. g.    For purposes of this section: Center means the Business Action Center within the Department of State established pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 003-2011. "Designated industry" means a designated industry, as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-125). Minority business means a minority business as defined in section 2 of P.L.1985, c.386 (C.34:1B-48). Pilot program means the Entrepreneur Learners Permit Pilot Program administered by the Business Action Center within the Department of State, as described in subsection a. of this section. Womens business means a womens business as defined in section 2 of P.L.1985, c.386 (C.34:1B-48). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.